District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

38-1967

Assignment of certain employees to salary classes.

Repealed.

Aug. 5, 1955, 69 Stat. 524, ch. 569, title III, § 4
Aug. 28, 1958, 72 Stat. 1007, Pub. L. 85-838, § 1
Oct. 24, 1962, 76 Stat. 1232, Pub. L. 87-881, title I, § 101(4)
Nov. 13, 1966, 80 Stat. 1598, Pub. L. 89-810, title II, § 202(3)
June 30, 1970, 84 Stat. 362, Pub. L. 91-297, title III, § 302(4)
Oct. 21, 1972, 86 Stat. 1009, Pub. L. 92-518, title I, § 103(2)
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-78, § 11, 29 DCR 49
1981 Ed., § 31-1121.
1973 Ed., § 31-1521.